Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 45.2-1611.
Objections by coal owner.

In deciding on objections by a coal owner to a proposed permit modification or drilling unit modification, only the following questions shall be considered:

Whether the work can be done safely with respect to persons engaged in coal mining at or near the well site; and

Whether the well work is an unreasonable or arbitrary exercise of the well operator’s right to explore for, market, and produce gas or oil.

In deciding on objections by a coal owner to the establishment of a drilling unit, the issuance of a permit for a new well, or the stimulation of a coalbed methane gas well, the following safety aspects shall first be considered, and no order or permit shall be issued where the evidence indicates that the proposed activity will be unsafe:

Whether the drilling unit or drilling location is above or in close proximity to any mine opening or shaft, entry, travel way, airway, haulageway, drainageway, or passageway, or to any proposed extension thereof, in any operated or abandoned or operating coal mine or in any coal mine already surveyed and platted but not yet being operated;

Whether the proposed drilling can reasonably be done through an existing or planned pillar of coal, or in close proximity to an existing well or such pillar of coal, taking into consideration the surface topography;

Whether the proposed well can be drilled safely or the proposed coalbed methane gas well can be stimulated safely, taking into consideration the dangers from creeps, squeezes, or other disturbances due to the extraction of coal; and

The extent to which the proposed drilling unit or drilling location or stimulation of the coalbed methane gas well unreasonably interferes with the safe recovery of coal, gas, or oil.

The following questions with respect to the drilling unit or drilling location of a new well or stimulation of a new coalbed methane gas well shall also be considered:

The extent to which the proposed drilling unit or drilling location or coalbed methane gas well stimulation will unreasonably interfere with present or future coal mining operations;

The feasibility of moving the proposed drilling unit or drilling location to a mined-out area, an area below the coal outcrop, or some other area;

The feasibility of a drilling moratorium for not more than two years in order to permit the completion of coal mining operations;

The methods proposed for the recovery of coal and gas;

The practicality of locating the unit or the well on a uniform pattern with other units or wells;

The surface topography and use; and

Whether the decision will substantially affect the right of the gas operator to explore for and produce the gas.

The factors in subsection C are not intended to and shall not be construed to authorize the Director, or the Board under §

45.2-1638

, to supersede, impair, abridge, or affect any contractual rights or obligations existing between the respective owners of coal and gas or any interest therein.

History.

1982, c. 347, § 45.1-318; 1990, c. 92, § 45.1-361.11; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Compulsory pooling. —

Senate Bill 376, Acts 2010, c. 730, does not expand the authority of the Virginia Gas and Oil Board to decide ownership claims involving conflicting claimants to gas royalties, property rights disputes, or contract interpretation. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Bradley C. Lambert, Chairman, Virginia Gas & Oil Board, Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy, 10-035,
2010 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (6/24/10).

§ 45.2-1612.
Distance limitations of certain wells.

If the well operator and the objecting coal owners who are present or represented at a hearing to consider the objections to the proposed drilling unit or location are unable to agree upon a drilling unit or location for a new well within 2,500 linear feet of the location of an existing well or a well for which a permit application is on file, then the permit or drilling unit shall be refused.

The distance limitation established by this section shall not apply if (i) the proposed well will be drilled through an existing or planned pillar of coal required for protection of a preexisting well drilled to any depth and (ii) the proposed well will neither require enlargement of the pillar nor otherwise have an adverse effect on existing or planned coal mining operations.

History.

1982, c. 347, § 45.1-319; 1990, c. 92, § 45.1-361.12; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.